Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-286.04
List of juvenile probationers; Office of Probation Administration; duties.

On or before the first day of each month, the Office of Probation Administration shall generate a list of all juvenile probationers in each county and provide such list to each law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.

Laws 2025, LB530, § 21.